Massachusetts, session 194th, SD2830.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7A of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
The department shall establish a pricing structure, including a daily price cap, for
contracts between private transportation companies and school committees for the transportation
of pupils receiving special education and out-of-district students, and for the transportation of
pupils in school districts receiving funds under the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless
Assistance Act, based on factors including the number of students transported daily, the number
of miles traveled and the schedule of rates and wages furnished by the commissioner of labor and
industries pursuant to the second paragraph, if such a schedule is furnished to a particular school
committee. A school transportation commission shall be established within the department to
promote fairness, equity and cost transparency in public school transportation for students
receiving special education and out-of-district students. The commission shall consist of the
of 2

following 15 members: 4 members from the department; 5 members serving on a school
committee, to be appointed by the commissioner; 3 members representing school transportation
providers, to be appointed by the governor; and 3 members of advocacy groups specializing in
issues related to students in foster care and experiencing homelessness. The commission shall
promulgate regulations, pursuant to chapter 30A, which shall include: (i) guidance on how to
better serve pupils in the foster care system or experiencing homelessness, or pupils from
migrant communities; and (ii) a system for ensuring compliance with the pricing structure and
pricing cap developed by the department. Annually, not later than September 30, the commission
shall conduct a review of school transportation contract compliance. Contracts exceeding a
financial threshold, to be determined by the commission, shall be subject to direct review and
approval, while all other contracts shall be subject to compliance audits and reporting
requirements as determined by the commission. The commission shall annually assess the impact
of the transportation pricing structure on the educational experience and outcomes for students,
including special education, homeless and foster care students. The department shall use the
results of the commission’s assessment to make necessary adjustments to the pricing structure,
policies and guidelines to ensure that the transportation system remains effective and equitable.
of 2